Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 2

Jerry F. Agee Tennessee Law Enforcement Training Academy

38-8-201. Creation and purpose.

There is created the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy, for the purpose of training police and law enforcement officers in the methods of maintaining law enforcement services in state, municipal, county and metropolitan jurisdictions.

In addition to attendance by law enforcement officers at the academy, students pursuing a degree with a major in law enforcement, criminal justice, or police science in a college or university of this state, and former members of the military who have been honorably discharged and who served a minimum of three (3) years' full-time service in the military, shall also be eligible for enrollment and training, the same as if the students and former members of the military were law enforcement officers in the academy. The students and former military members shall also meet the requirements set forth in § 38-8-106 and the standards established by the peace officer standards and training commission as required for law enforcement officers attending the academy.

The academy shall also have the authority to provide specialized training to other government or private sector employees whose work impacts public safety, such as court officials, emergency services personnel, process servers, hospital personnel and employees of the criminal justice system. It is the intent of the general assembly that the training be provided at no additional cost to the state. The director of the academy shall have full discretion in scheduling any additional training sessions offered by the academy; provided, that the training of state or local governmental law enforcement employees be given priority over private employee training.

Acts 1963, ch. 173, § 1; 1969, ch. 144, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; T.C.A., § 38-801; Acts 2006, ch. 659, § 1; 2016, ch. 530, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1963, ch. 173 created the Tennessee Police Training Institute. In 1965, Executive Order 24 changed the name of the institute to the Tennessee law enforcement training academy and created a five-member commission. In 1971, Executive Order 1 changed the name of the commission to the board of control. Acts 1979, ch. 93 changed the name to the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy. In 1983, Executive Order 46 (February 11, 1983) established a nine-member board of control and placed the academy under the department of safety.

Compiler's Notes. For designation of department of safety as responsible for administration of academy, and establishment of board of control of academy, see Executive Order No. 46 (February 11, 1983).

Amendments. The 2016 amendment in (b) inserted, “criminal justice” preceding “or police science”, inserted “, and former members of the military who have been honorably discharged and who served a minimum of three (3) years' full-time service in the military” preceding “shall also be eligible”, and substituted “the students and former members of the military” for “they” preceding “were law enforcement officers” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 530, § 3. February, 1, 2016.

Cross-References. Registration of persons acting as law enforcement officers, § 8-8-221.

38-8-202. State building commission to acquire site and build and equip facility.

The state building commission is authorized and empowered to acquire a site or sites and to construct a suitable building or buildings for conducting the programs of the academy.

The commission is authorized to accept from any agency or department of state or local government a site or building by gift or donation, and in such event, may expend any capital outlay funds available for the restoration, renovation, repair and equipping of such facility.

Acts 1963, ch. 173, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; T.C.A., § 38-802.

38-8-203. Control — Personnel — Fees.

The police and law enforcement programs offered through the academy shall be under the jurisdiction of such agency or agencies of the state of Tennessee as the governor shall designate by executive order. The commissioner of the agency appointed pursuant to executive order shall hire the director of the academy. The director, subject to approval of the appropriate state officials, is authorized to employ any personnel that may be reasonably required.

The academy may charge reasonable fees to cover costs of any food, lodging, instructional materials, equipment or services furnished trainees as may be established by the appropriate state officials.

Acts 1963, ch. 173, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; T.C.A., § 38-803; Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1963, ch. 173 created the Tennessee Police Training Institute. In 1965, Executive Order 24 changed the name of the institute to the Tennessee law enforcement training academy and created a five-member commission. In 1971, Executive Order 1 changed the name of the commission to the board of control. Acts 1979, ch. 93, changed the name to the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee law enforcement training academy. In 1983, Executive Order 46 (February 11, 1983) established a nine-member board of control and placed the academy under the department of safety.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

38-8-204. Authorization to contract with units of government.

The agency designated by the governor to operate the academy, through its duly appointed representative, is authorized to enter into such contract or contracts with state, municipal, county or metropolitan law enforcement officials as may be necessary in order to carry out the provisions and purposes of this chapter.

The power to contract conferred by this section includes the power to contract with public agencies or officials for enrolling trainees in general courses, and establishing special courses designed to meet specific needs of agencies or units of government.

Acts 1963, ch. 173, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; T.C.A., § 38-804.

38-8-205. Authorization to spend appropriated and contributed funds.

The agency designated by the governor to operate the academy, through its duly appointed representative, is authorized to expend such funds as may be appropriated by the general assembly and allotted by the commissioner of finance and administration for the purposes of this chapter; and to accept and expend any local, federal or foundation funds or contributions as may be received and allotted for the purposes of this part.

Acts 1963, ch. 173, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; T.C.A., § 38-805.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

38-8-206. Consultations with law enforcement officials.

In the establishment and operation of the academy, the state building commission and the designated agency for operation shall consult and advise with both state and local law enforcement officials, including, but not limited to, the departments of safety and correction, the wildlife resources agency, the district attorneys general, and local officials including representatives of municipal and county law enforcement agencies and with such educational agencies as may be deemed advisable.

Acts 1963, ch. 173, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 16-21; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; T.C.A., § 38-806.

38-8-207. On the job experience for institute instructors.

It is the policy of this section to provide continuing on the job experience for instructors of the academy so that the instructors are made continually aware of the problems of and procedures within law enforcement agencies.

The commissioner of commerce and insurance may, in the commissioner's discretion, commission the director of the academy as a law enforcement officer or commission any instructor at the academy as a law enforcement officer on the written recommendation to the commissioner by the director. Any person who is commissioned pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be sworn according to the provisions of §§ 8-8-101 and 8-18-111.

Upon the request of the chief official of any law enforcement agency of the state, a county, or a municipality, the director may designate one (1) or more of the commissioned instructors at the academy to assist the agency in its law enforcement role. In designating the instructors to a law enforcement agency, the director shall consider the need for actual law enforcement experience of the instructors and the availability of the instructors to the requesting agency.

An instructor, when designated to an agency, will be required to be bonded in the manner and amount provided by law for the capacity in which the instructor shall serve.

An instructor, when designated, shall serve under the supervision of the chief official of the agency in which the instructor is serving.

An instructor, when designated, shall receive no compensation other than that to which the instructor is entitled as an instructor at the academy.

Acts 1976, ch. 603, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 38-807 — 38-809; Acts 1989, ch. 410, § 1; 2006, ch. 1009, § 5.